Texas, session 892, HB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 372, Transportation Code, is amended by adding Section 372.0525 to read as follows: Sec. 372.0525.  SUSPENSION OF TOLL COLLECTION DURING EVACUATION ORDER.  During the period an evacuation order under Section 418.108, Government Code, is in effect, a toll project entity may not collect a toll for use of a toll project if the project is located in the area designated for evacuation by the order. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.